Hawaii statutes.
[§657D-6] Effect on rights, remedies, etc.,
pursuant to written agreements entered after commencement of military service.
Nothing in this chapter shall prevent:

(1) The modification, termination, or cancellation of
any contract, lease, or bailment or any obligation secured by mortgage, trust
deed, lien, or other security in the nature of a mortgage; or

(2) The repossession, retention, foreclosure, sale,
forfeiture, or taking possession of property that is security for any
obligation or which has been purchased or received under a contract, lease, or
bailment;

pursuant to a written agreement of the parties
thereto (including the person in military service, whether or not the person is
a party to the obligation), or their assignees, executed during or after the
period of military service of that person. [L 1994, c 257, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next